Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 21
JUNIOR COLLEGES

Section.

33-2101. Junior college districts, approvals, boundaries of junior college areas.

Junior college districts may be formed and organized in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, and junior colleges maintained therein shall be intermediate institutions of higher education above grade twelve (12).

To provide for the orderly establishment and growth of junior colleges, a statewide system of six junior college areas is hereby created, as hereafter described. The State Board of Education shall only approve the existence of one centrally located district in any area until the enrollment of such junior college therein exceeds 1000 full time day students a year from within the area.

The boundaries of junior college areas hereby created may be changed by the State Board of Education upon 30 days notice to the boards of trustees of each school district in each of the junior college areas affected and upon public hearing. No change shall be made to place more than one existing junior college in an area. Notice of any boundary change shall forthwith be filed with the board of county commissioners of each county affected.

Area No. 1 shall comprise the territory of the counties of Benewah, Bonner, Boundary, Kootenai and Shoshone.

Area No. 2 shall comprise the territory of the counties of Clearwater, Idaho, Latah, Lewis and Nez Perce.

Area No. 3 shall comprise the territory of the counties of Ada, Adams, Boise, Canyon, Gem, Payette, Valley, Washington, that portion of Elmore County lying generally west of a line described as follows:

Beginning at the junction of the boundary line common to Blaine, Boise, Custer and Elmore counties, thence proceeding in a general southerly direction along the boundaries of Blaine and Elmore counties and Blaine and Camas counties to the northeast corner of Section 1, T. 1 S., R. 11 E., B.M.; thence west 3 miles to the northwest corner of Section 3, same township and range; thence south 4 miles to the southwest corner of Section 22, T. 1 S., R. 11 E., B.M.; thence west a distance of 15 miles more or less to the southwest corner of Section 19, T. 1 S., R. 9 E., B.M.; thence south 2 miles to the southwest corner of Section 31, T. 1 S., R. 9 E., B.M.; thence west a distance of one and three-fourths (1 3/4) miles more or less to a point where the south section line of Section 35, T. 1 S., R. 8 E., B.M., intersects Bennett Creek; thence in a southwesterly direction down said Bennett Creek approximately 8 miles more or less to the southwest corner of Section 27, T. 2 S., R. 8 E., B.M.; thence south along the section lines 5 miles to the southwest corner of Section 22, T. 3 S., R. 8 E., B.M.; thence west 3 miles to the northwest corner of Section 30, T. 3 S., R. 8 E., B.M.; thence south along the section lines a distance of 14 miles more or less to the Snake River which is also the boundary between Elmore and Owyhee counties;

and that portion of Owyhee County lying generally west of a line described as follows:

Beginning at the northwest corner of Section 33, T. 5 S., R. 7 E., B.M., which is on the boundary of Elmore and Owyhee counties, thence south along the section lines 7 miles more or less to the southwest corner of Section 33, T. 6 S., R. 7 E., B.M.; thence west to the northwest corner of Section 4, T. 7 S., R. 7 E., B.M.; thence south one and one-half (1 ½) miles more or less to the southwest corner of Section 9, T. 7 S., R. 7 E., B.M.; thence east along the section lines 10 miles more or less to the northeast corner of Section 13, T. 7 S., R. 8 E., B.M.; thence south 4 miles to the southeast corner of Section 36, T. 7 S., R. 8 E., B.M.; thence east twenty-one and one-half (21 ½) miles more or less to the north-south center line of Section 3, T. 8 S., R. 12 E., B.M.; which is also the boundary line of Twin Falls and Owyhee counties; thence south along said boundary lines 36 miles to the township line between Townships 13 South and 14 South, R. 12 E., B.M.; thence west along said township line twenty-seven and one-half (27 ½) miles more or less to the southwest corner of Section 31, T. 13 S., R. 8 E., B.M.; thence south along the section lines 17 miles more or less to the southwest corner of Section 30, T. 16 S., R. 8 E., B.M.; which is also the Nevada State Line.
Area No. 4 shall comprise the territory of the counties of Blaine, Camas, Cassia, Gooding, Jerome, Lincoln, Minidoka, Twin Falls, and those portions of the counties of Elmore and Owyhee not included in the description of Area No. 3.

Area No. 5 shall comprise the territory of the counties of Bannock, Bear Lake, Caribou, Franklin, Oneida, Power, and that portion of Bingham County lying west of a line described as follows:

Beginning at the northeast corner of Section 1, T. 3 N., R. 33 E., B.M.; which is also a point common to Jefferson, Bonneville and Bingham counties; thence due south on the section line a distance of eighteen (18) miles to the southeast corner of Section 36, T. 1 N., R. 33 E., B.M.; thence east on the township line a distance of five and one-half (5 ½) miles more or less to the north-south center line of Section 6, T. 1 S., R. 35 E., B.M.; thence south on the center section line a distance of six (6) miles more or less to a point where said center line intersects the east-west section line common to Section 6, T. 2 S., R. 35 E., B.M. and Section 31, T. 1 S., R. 35 E., B.M.; thence east along said section line a distance of five and one-half (5 ½) miles more or less to the northeast corner of Section 1, T. 2 S., R. 35 E., B.M.; thence south one and one-half (1 ½) miles to the southwest corner of the northwest quarter of Section 7, T. 2 S., R. 36 E., B.M.; thence east six (6) miles more or less to the Range line common to Ranges 36 and 37 E., B.M.; thence south on said Range line two and one-quarter (2 ¼) miles more or less to its point of intersection with the Blackfoot River; thence following the Blackfoot River in a northeasterly and southeasterly direction to a point where said river intersects the township line common to Bingham and Caribou counties.

Area No. 6 shall comprise the territory of the counties of Bonneville, Butte, Clark, Custer, Fremont, Jefferson, Lemhi, Madison, Teton, and that portion of Bingham County not included in the description of Area No. 5.

33-2101A. Junior college shall mean community college.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in sections 21-805, 21-806, 21-809, 23-404, 31-808, 33-101, 33-107, 33-107B, 33-601, 33-1252, 33-2101, 33-2102, 33-2103, 33-2104, 33-2105, 33-2106, 33-2107, 33-2107A, 33-2107B, 33-2107C, 33-2108, 33-2109A, 33-2110, 33-2110A, 33-2110B, 33-2111, 33-2112, 33-2113, 33-2114, 33-2115, 33-2116, 33-2117, 33-2118, 33-2119, 33-2121, 33-2122, 33-2123, 33-2124, 33-2125, 33-2126, 33-2130, 33-2135, 33-2137, 33-2138, 33-2139, 33-2141, 33-2142, 33-2143, 33-2144, 33-2211, 33-3716, 33-4001, 33-4003, 33-4004, 33-4006, 33-4201, 46-314, 50-1721, 57-1105A, 59-1324, 59-1371, 59-1374, 67-2320, 67-2322 and 67-5332, Idaho Code, the term “junior college” shall mean and shall be denoted as “community college.”

33-2102. Courses of study.

A community college established pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall give instruction in academic subjects, and in such nonacademic subjects as shall be authorized by its board of trustees.

The academic courses given and the instruction therein shall be of the same standard as the same are given and taught in the first two (2) years of any other state institution of higher education, and credits therefor shall be accepted by other state institutions for credit toward a baccalaureate degree, pursuant to section 33-3728, Idaho Code.

33-2103. Minimum requirements for the formation of a junior college district.

A junior college district shall include (a) the area, or any part thereof, of four (4) or more school districts and the area or any part thereof, of one (1) or more counties having an aggregate enrollment in grades nine (9) through twelve (12) during the school year, next preceding the organization of such district, of not less than two thousand (2000) students, and (b) property having market value for assessment purposes as shown by the equalized assessment rolls of real and personal property for the preceding calendar year of not less than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000).

The state board of education in considering a petition filed pursuant to section 33-2104, Idaho Code, shall verify all the above requirements, as well as determine the number of the students expected to attend and the facilities available, or to be made available, for operation of the school.

33-2104. Formation of community college districts.

A community college district may be organized by the vote of the school district electors of the proposed district, voting at an election called and held as herein provided:

a. A petition or petitions, signed by not less than one thousand (1,000) qualified electors as defined in section 34-104, Idaho Code, residing in the proposed community college district, giving the name of the proposed community college, describing the boundaries of the proposed district and praying for the organization of the territory therein described as a community college district, together with a true copy thereof, shall be filed with the clerk of the board of county commissioners of the county in which such proposed district is to be located;

b. Said petition or petitions shall be presented to the clerk of the board of county commissioners. An examination to verify whether or not the petition signers are qualified electors shall be conducted by the county clerk as provided in section 34-1807, Idaho Code;

c. In the event the petition is found by the county clerk to contain the required number of signatures, the clerk shall file the original in his office, and forthwith mail the copy thereof to the state board of education for its consideration and recommendation. The state board of education shall consider the existing opportunities for education beyond grade twelve (12) in the proposed district, the number of prospective students for such community college, the financial ability of the proposed district to maintain such college and furnish the standard of education contemplated by this chapter with income from tuition and other sources as herein provided. If the state board approves the establishment of such community college, it shall so advise the board of county commissioners within thirty (30) days after the receipt of such petition or petitions, and recommend that an election be called as herein provided for the organization of such district;

d. Upon receipt by the board of county commissioners of the written approval of the state board of education, the board of county commissioners shall enter an order that a special election be called within the proposed new district for the purpose of voting on the question of the creation of such district on one (1) of the election dates enumerated in section 34-106, Idaho Code. No notice of election need be posted, but notice shall be published, the election shall be conducted and the returns thereof canvassed as required in chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code. The ballot shall contain the words “Community College District — Yes” and “Community College District — No,” along with a voting position in which the voter may express his choice. If two-thirds (2/3) of all votes cast be in the affirmative, the board of county commissioners shall enter an order declaring such community college district established, designating its name and boundaries. A certified copy of such order shall forthwith be filed with the state board of education;

33-2104A. Community college trustee zones.

Each existing community college district shall be divided into five (5) trustee zones. Each trustee position on the board shall be designated to a zone so that each trustee zone contains one (1) designated trustee position.

The boundaries of the several trustee zones in each existing community college district shall be drawn so that the five (5) zones are as nearly equal in population as practicable. If a community college district is situated within two (2) or more counties, and any one (1) of the counties has sufficient population to warrant at least one (1) zone, then the boundaries of a trustee zone shall be located wholly within the boundaries of such county.

A proposal to redefine the boundaries of trustee zones of a community college district shall be initiated by its board of trustees at the first meeting following the report of the decennial census or following the electors’ approval of the addition of territory pursuant to section 33-2105, Idaho Code. The board of trustees shall submit the proposal to the state board of education within one hundred twenty (120) days following the decennial census or election. The proposal shall include a legal description of each proposed trustee zone, a map of the district showing how each proposed trustee zone would appear and the approximate population each zone would have should the proposal to change the boundaries of the trustee zones become effective.

Within sixty (60) days after receipt of a proposal submitted pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the state board of education may approve or disapprove the proposal to redefine the boundaries of the trustee zones and shall give written notice of its decision to the board of trustees of the district wherein the change is proposed. If the state board of education disapproves a proposal, then it shall provide the board of trustees with a written explanation setting forth its reasons for disapproval. Within forty-five (45) days of receipt of a disapproval, the board of trustees shall submit a revised proposal to the state board of education. If the state board of education approves the proposal, then it shall notify the board of trustees, the trustee zones shall be changed in accordance with the proposal and a copy of the legal description of each trustee zone and map of the district showing how each trustee zone will appear shall be filed by the board of trustees with the county clerk of the home county.

At the next regular meeting of the board of trustees following the state board’s approval of a proposal submitted pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the community college board of trustees shall appoint from its membership a trustee for each new zone to serve as trustee until that incumbent trustee’s term expires. If the current board membership includes two (2) or more incumbent trustees who reside in the same trustee zone, then the following applies:

The position on the board held by the trustee with the greatest amount of time remaining in such trustee’s term shall be the position on the board designated to the zone wherein such trustee resides.

If there is no difference in the amount of time remaining in the incumbents’ terms, then the position on the board held by the most senior trustee shall be designated to the zone wherein such trustee resides.

If there is no difference in seniority among the incumbents, then a majority vote of the sitting board, excluding the incumbents subject to the vote, shall determine which incumbent trustee shall be designated to the zone wherein such trustees reside and the remaining trustee or trustees shall be designated to the position or positions on the board in the zone or zones wherein no incumbent trustee resides.
(6) Any incumbent trustee whose position on the board has been designated to a zone other than the zone in which such trustee resides may complete their term; however, when the position is next scheduled to be placed on the ballot, only persons residing in the zone to which the position has been designated shall be eligible to run for the position.

(7) Notwithstanding the time requirements set forth in this section, on or before July 1, 2016, the board of trustees of each community college district formed before the effective date of this act shall obtain a state board of education-approved proposal to divide the district into five (5) trustee zones. Trustee terms due for the 2016 election shall be subject to the zoning and board position requirements set forth in this section.

33-2105. Addition of territory to community college districts.

Any territory not in an existing community college district may become a part of a community college district by a vote of the school district electors resident of said territory, voting at an election called and held as herein provided.

A petition signed by not less than one hundred (100) school district electors of the territory proposed to be added to the community college district, or twenty percent (20%) of the school district electors within the territory, whichever is the lesser, describing the boundaries of the territory, and a true copy thereof, shall be filed with the board of trustees of the community college district. The board shall forward the original of said petition, with its recommendations, to the state board of education, and a copy thereof to the board of county commissioners of the home county of the community college district. The state board of education shall consider such petition, as it is required to consider a petition for the formation of a community college district. If it approve the petition, notice to that effect shall be given the board of trustees of the community college district and to the board of county commissioners of the home county of the community college district.

When any such petition has been approved by the state board of education, an election shall be held in the manner of elections for the creation of a community college district, except that polling places shall be established only in the territory proposed to be added to the district. The question shall be deemed approved only if a majority of the votes cast in the territory were cast in favor of the proposal, and if this be the case, the territory shall be part of said community college district with all the force and effect as though said territory had been originally included in said community college district at the time of its original organization.

Notices to and by boards of county commissioners and to the state board of education shall be as provided in section 33-2104, Idaho Code. The state board of education shall notify the state liquor division that such territory has become a part of the community college district.

33-2106. Trustees of community college districts.

The board of trustees of each community college district shall consist of five (5) electors who shall reside in a different trustee zone from each other and who shall be appointed or elected as provided in this section.

Immediately following the establishment of a new community college district, the state board of education shall divide the district into five (5) trustee zones, which shall be as nearly equal in population as practicable. If a community college district is situated within two (2) or more counties, and any one (1) of the counties has sufficient population to warrant at least one (1) zone, then the boundaries of a trustee zone shall be located wholly within the boundaries of such county. The state board shall also appoint the members of the first board who shall serve until the election and qualification of their successors.

At the first election of trustees after the creation of a district, five (5) trustees shall be elected: two (2) for terms of two (2) years each, and three (3) for terms of four (4) years each. Thereafter, the successors of persons so elected shall be elected for terms of four (4) years.

Excluding any first election of trustees after the creation of a district, at any other election of trustees held in 2008, and in each trustee election thereafter, trustees shall be elected to terms of four (4) years. If more than two (2) trustee positions are eligible for election in 2008, one (1) trustee shall be elected to a term of four (4) years and two (2) trustees shall be elected to a term of six (6) years. Thereafter, the successors of persons so elected in 2008 shall be elected for terms of four (4) years.

The expiration of any term shall be at the regular meeting of the trustees next following the election for the successor terms.

Elections of trustees of community college districts shall be biennially, in even-numbered years, and shall be held on a date authorized in section 34-106, Idaho Code. Vacancies on the board of trustees shall be filled by appointment by the remaining members, but if by reason of vacancies there remain on the board less than a majority of the required number of members, appointment to fill such vacancies shall be made by the state board of education. Any person so appointed must reside in the trustee zone where the vacancy occurs and shall serve until the next trustee election, at which time his successor shall be elected for the unexpired term. The trustees shall take and subscribe the oath of office required in the case of state officers and said oath shall be filed with the secretary of state.

Notice of the election, the conduct thereof, the qualification of electors and the canvass of returns shall be as prescribed in chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code.

All eligible electors within a community college district may vote for candidates in each and every zone. An individual who is a candidate for a specific zone of the community college district must reside in that same specific zone, and the candidate in each zone receiving the largest number of votes from the district shall be declared elected. An individual shall be a candidate for a specific position of the board and each candidate must declare which position he seeks on the board of trustees. If it be necessary to resolve a tie between two (2) or more persons, the board of trustees shall determine by lot which thereof shall be declared elected. The clerk of the board shall promptly notify any person by mail of his election, enclosing a form of oath to be subscribed by him as herein provided.

When elections held pursuant to this section coincide with other elections held by the state of Idaho or any subdivision thereof, or any municipality or school district, the board of trustees may make agreement with the body holding such election for joint boards of election and the payment of fees and expenses of such boards of election on such proportionate basis as may be agreed upon.
(6) At its first meeting following the appointment of the first board of trustees, and at the first regular meeting following any community college trustee election, the board shall organize, and shall elect one (1) of its members chairman, one (1) a vice-chairman; and shall elect a secretary and a treasurer, who may be members of the board; or one (1) person to serve as secretary and treasurer, who may be a member of the board.

(7) The board shall set a given day of a given week in each month as its regular meeting time. Three (3) members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of official business.

(8) The authority of trustees of community college districts shall be limited in the manner prescribed in section 33-507, Idaho Code.

(9) Any decision of the state board of education issued pursuant to chapter 21, title 33, Idaho Code, may be appealed to the district court of any county in which the district or proposed district lies or shall lie. The pleadings and other papers shall be filed not more than sixty (60) days after notice of the order appealed and service of two (2) copies thereof shall be made upon the state board of education.

33-2107. General powers of the board of trustees.

The board of trustees of each community college district shall have the power:

To adopt policies and regulations for its own government and the government of the college;

To employ legal counsel and other professional and nonprofessional persons, and to prescribe their qualifications;

To acquire and hold, and to dispose of, real and personal property, and to construct, repair, remodel and remove buildings in the manner prescribed for trustees of school districts pursuant to sections 33-301 and 33-601, Idaho Code;

To contract for the acquisition, purchase or repair of buildings in the manner prescribed for trustees of school districts pursuant to section 33-601, Idaho Code;

To issue general obligation or revenue bonds in the manner now, or as may be, prescribed by law;

To convey and transfer real property of the district upon which no college buildings used for instruction are situated, to nonprofit corporations, school districts, junior college housing commissions, counties or municipalities, with or without consideration; to rent real or personal property for the use of the college, its students or faculty, for such terms as may be determined by the board of trustees; to lease real property of the district not actually in use for college instructional purposes for such terms as may be determined by the board; and to lease real property and improvements to the Idaho state building authority, for a term not to exceed fifty (50) years, with or without consideration, and to enter into agreements with the Idaho state building authority for the Idaho state building authority to provide a facility, pursuant to section 67-6410, Idaho Code;

To acquire, hold and dispose of water rights;

To accept grants or gifts of money, materials or property of any kind from any governmental agency, or from any person, firm or association, on such terms as may be determined by the granter;

To cooperate with any governmental agency, or any person, firm or association in the conduct of any educational program; to accept grants from any source for the conduct of such program; and to conduct such program on, or off, campus;

To invest any funds of the district in such securities, and apply the interest or profits from such investment, as prescribed for the investment of the funds, and the application of the interest or profits, in the case of school district boards of trustees.

33-2107A. Establishment and operation of third and fourth year college curriculum in community college districts.

The board of trustees of a community college district of an urban area, upon filing with the state board of education a notice of intent to exercise the powers herein granted, shall thereafter be authorized and empowered to organize and operate an upper division consisting of the third and fourth years of college curriculum with powers to grant baccalaureate degrees in liberal arts and sciences, business and education. Upper division courses and programs are subject to approval pursuant to section 33-107(8), Idaho Code. The operation of the community college and the upper division shall be kept separate; however, the joint use of facilities is authorized provided a proper cost allocation is made. The buildings and equipment for the use of said upper division may be purchased, leased, constructed, maintained, and administered from funds obtained by the board of trustees’ levy. Such levy shall not exceed two hundredths percent (.02%) of the market value for assessment purposes on all taxable property within the taxing district. Said board under section 33-2113, Idaho Code, may obtain capital funds through issuance of general obligation bonds for such equipment and buildings, with the total tax levy for operation and bonds of the upper division not to exceed the levy limit authorized in this section. Such tax shall be certified and levied as provided for other taxes of the district. All other costs of operation of said upper division shall be provided by tuition and fees paid by the student. Gifts and grants may be accepted by the board of trustees for this or other purposes. A student who has been a resident of the community college district pursuant to section 33-2110B, Idaho Code, for not less than one (1) year at time of admission to the upper division, or who has completed the first two (2) years in the college, shall be given preference for admission to the upper division.

33-2107B. Powers granted by preceding section in addition to other powers.

The provisions of this act shall be in addition to all powers and authorities heretofore vested by law or by regulation of the state board of education in the board of trustees of a community college district and all provisions of sections 33-2101, 33-2103 through 33-2115, Idaho Code, and any additions or supplements amendatory thereto, shall be applicable to providing the third and fourth year college curriculum within such community college districts, unless the same are specifically in contradiction with any provision of this act.

33-2107C. Definition of urban area districts empowered to create upper divisions.

The powers provided herein for instruction of the third and fourth year college curriculum shall be exercisable only by community college districts which at the date of the filing of notice of establishment of upper divisions as required are urban area districts, which is defined as a taxing district containing: (a) market value for assessment purposes of taxable property of not less than three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000); and (b) a population of not less than ninety thousand (90,000) persons, in the taxing district where the college is located.

33-2108. Junior college districts public corporations — Sue and be sued — Corporate seal.

Each junior college district shall be a public corporation, may sue and be sued in its corporate name, and shall have an official seal which shall be judicially noticed.

33-2109. President — Instructors and other employees — Requirements for admission and graduation — Certificates and diplomas — Textbooks and equipment.

The board of trustees shall elect a president of the college and, upon his recommendation, appoint such officers, instructors, specialists, clerks and other personnel as it may deem necessary; fix their salaries, and prescribe their duties. It shall fix the requirements for admission, and the time and standard of graduation, and issue such certificates for graduation and diplomas as may be deemed suitable. It shall prescribe the textbooks, and provide suitable apparatus, furniture and equipment for carrying on the work of the college.

33-2109A. Use of unused sick leave.

Upon separation from employment with the community college district by retirement, in accordance with chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code, or with chapter 1, title 33, Idaho Code, an employee shall be accorded credit for unused sick leave as provided in section 67-5333, Idaho Code. Each community college district shall contribute to the sick leave account for the purposes of this section, as provided in subsection (2)(c) of section 67-5333, Idaho Code.

33-2109B. Sick leave transferred — Boise State University

College of Western Idaho. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to Section 3 of S.L. 2009, ch. 22, effective September 2, 2009.

33-2110. Tuition.

All students of a community college shall pay tuition that shall be fixed annually by the board of trustees not later than the 1st day of August of each year. The tuition for full-time students taking normal academic courses provided by the college, who are residents of the district, shall be fixed at not less than three hundred fifty dollars ($350) per annum, and may be increased by increments of not more than ten percent (10%) per annum to a maximum tuition of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per annum. The tuition shall be, as nearly as is practicable, the annual costs of all elements of providing the courses of instruction, including interest on general obligation bonds, teaching, administration, maintenance, operation and depreciation of equipment and buildings, supplies and fuel, and other ordinary and necessary expenses of operation incurred in providing courses by the community college, provided that the tuition of students residing outside the district but within the county or counties wherein the district is located shall be fixed after taking into account moneys received by the community college district from any funds allocated to the community college from the educational funds of the state of Idaho, other than allocations for career technical education; and provided that the tuition of students residing outside the district and the county but within the state of Idaho shall be fixed after taking into account moneys received from educational funds other than career technical moneys, as referred to in this chapter, from the state of Idaho. Receipt of moneys, as hereinbefore provided in this section, shall be based upon the receipts from the sources referred to during the fiscal year preceding the fixing of the tuition. A student in a community college shall not be deemed a resident of the district or of the county or of the state of Idaho, unless that student is deemed a resident as defined by section 33-2110B, Idaho Code, for the district, county or state prior to the date of his first enrollment in the community college, and no student who was not a resident of the district, county or state shall gain residence while attending and enrolled in the community college. The residence of a minor shall be deemed to be the residence of his parents or parent or guardian. Tuition shall be payable in advance, but the board may, in its discretion, permit tuition to be paid in installments.

The board of trustees shall also fix fees for laboratory and other special services provided by the community college and for special courses, including, but not limited to, night school, off-campus courses, summer school, career technical courses, as otherwise provided in this chapter, and other special instruction provided by the community college and nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to control the amount of tuition for special courses or fees for special services, as herein provided, but the same shall be, as nearly as reasonable, sufficient to cover the cost of all elements of providing courses as above defined.
(3) In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions shall be uniformly applied. The application of these definitions shall be retroactive and prospective.

“Fees” shall include all charges imposed by the governing body, to students, as a whole or individually, in excess of tuition. Student fees may be imposed for special courses, instruction, and service:

“Special course or instruction fee” means those fees charged for any class or educational endeavor that has unique costs beyond a traditional college lecture class; for example, foreign language audio or visual instruction, specialized musical instruction, computer class, art class involving supplies or audiovisual equipment, career technical instruction, laboratory class, remedial instruction, team teaching, satellite transmissions, outside instructor, professionally assisted instruction, etc.

“Special service fee” means those fees charged for activity, benefit, or assistance offered to students which is beyond traditional classroom instruction; for example, student government support, providing of student health staff or facilities, student union support, intramural and intercollegiate athletics, recreational opportunities, financial aid services, graduation expense, automobile parking, student yearbook/publication, insurance, registration, noncapital library user fee, etc.

“Tuition” means a sum charged students for cost of college instruction and shall include costs associated with maintenance and operation of physical plant, student services and institutional support.

Fees shall not be imposed for any capital improvements except as specifically authorized in chapter 21, title 33, Idaho Code.